Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 1, section 7, subdivision 18, is amended to read: Subd. 18. Heartland State Trail 2,950,000 (a) For capital improvements to the Heartland State Trail. Of this amount, (1) $550,000 is for construction of a trail segment of the Heartland State Trail between Detroit Lakes and Frazeenew text begin , with any remaining money to be used for environmental review, preliminary engineering, and design of the Heartland Trail from the west Becker County line to Detroit Lakes, Park Rapids to Osage, and from Osage to Frazeenew text end ; and (2) $2,400,000 is for the environmental review, predesign, design, and construction of a paved multiple-use trail to connect Itasca State Park to the Heartland State Trail beginning from the park contact station to the park's southeast boundary and through a Phase 1 tunnel to be constructed under marked U.S. Highway 71, and continuing from there for about two miles. (b) This appropriation is in addition to the appropriations in Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 6, subdivision 6, and Laws 2020, Fifth Special Session chapter 3, article 1, section 7, subdivision 12.